Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201477-1937
Repealed. Laws 2013, LB341, § 22. Operative date January 1, 2015. Tax certificate foreclosure proceedings under old law; distribution of proceeds of sale.

From the proceeds of the sale of such real estate in the foreclosure proceedings or of any such sales which may have heretofore been had and where the proceeds have not been already distributed, there shall first be paid the costs of sale, the court costs, including any attorneys' fees to be paid on account of said foreclosure, any reasonable expense in taking care of the property, and all costs for advertising delinquent taxes. The balance, if any, shall be distributed to the governmental bodies in the following manner: By paying the taxes which shall have been unpaid by the previous owners, with interest and penalties, in the inverse order assessed, to the extent of the proceeds, and any unpaid taxes thereafter remaining shall be canceled in the books of the county.

Laws 1947, c. 264, § 5, p. 857.